Rhode Island statutes. Title 1 Aeronautics
Chapter 2 Airports and Landing Fields

1-2-1.
Powers of the director of the Rhode Island airport corporation.

The director has supervision over the state airport at Warwick and any other airports constructed or operated by the state. The director shall enforce the provisions of this chapter. Furthermore, the director is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations for the safe and efficient operation of airports, airport facilities, and grounds.

As used in this chapter:

“Airport corporation” means the Rhode Island airport corporation.

“Director” means the executive director of the Rhode Island airport corporation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 63; G.L. 1938, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

1-2-1

; P.L. 1983, ch. 32, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 371, § 2.

1-2-1.1.
Powers relating to vehicular traffic accessing airport facilities — Rhode Island T.F. Green International Airport.

The Rhode Island airport corporation is authorized:

To impose charges on customers of rental companies, as defined in §

31-34.1-1

, who directly or indirectly use Warwick Station or the Rhode Island T.F. Green International Airport, at the rates that the Rhode Island airport corporation may deem necessary to provide adequate revenue to pay all costs of constructing, reconstructing, expanding, reconfiguring, operating, and maintaining Warwick Station regardless of whether those charges may have an anticompetitive effect; and

To regulate the access of vehicular traffic to airport properties including by excluding one or more classes of vehicular traffic from accessing portions of airport roadways, parking lots, curbsides, and other vehicular facilities.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of Rhode Island airport corporation to impose other fees, charges, rates, or rentals including any other fees, charges, rates, or rentals imposed on rental companies or to adopt other regulations.

All customer facility charges collected under the authority of subsection (a)(1)(i) of this section and all customer facility charges collected by any rental company from customers under color of those provisions, or pursuant to regulations adopted by the airport corporation, constitute a trust fund for the airport corporation until paid. That trust is enforceable against: (1) The rental company; (2) Any officer, agent, servant, or employee of any rental company responsible for either the collection or payment, or both, of the customer facility charge; (3) Any person receiving any part of the fund without consideration, or knowing that the rental company or any officer, agent, servant, or employee of any rental company is committing a breach of trust; and (4) The estates, heirs, and representatives of persons or entities described in subsections (b)(1) — (b)(3); provided, that a customer to whom a refund has been properly made, or any person who receives payment of a lawful obligation of the rental company from that fund, is presumed to have received that amount in good faith and without any knowledge of the breach of trust.

If the airport corporation or any officer of the corporation believes that the payment to the airport corporation of the trust fund established under subsection (b) of this section will be jeopardized by delay, neglect, or misappropriation, the airport corporation or officer shall notify the rental company that the trust fund shall be segregated, and kept separate and apart from all other funds and assets of the rental company and shall not be commingled with any other funds or assets. The notice shall be given by either hand delivery or by registered mail, return receipt requested. Within four (4) days after the sending of the notice, all of the customer facility charges which thereafter either become collectible or are collected shall be deposited daily in any financial institution in the state as defined in title 19 and those customer facility charges designated as a special fund in trust for the airport corporation and payable to the airport corporation by the rental company as trustee of that fund.

The penalty for misappropriations provided by §

44-19-37

shall apply as though that section referred to “customer facility charge” in each place where it refers to “tax”.

The provisions of subsections (b), (c), and (d) of this section are not exclusive, and are in addition to all other remedies the airport corporation may employ in the enforcement and collection of customer facility charges.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 40, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 32, § 2, effective June 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 36, § 2, effective June 1, 2021.

1-2-2.
Conferring with persons versed in aviation — Cooperation with federal agencies — Employment of assistants.

The director is authorized to confer with persons versed in aviation; to cooperate with the various United States government agencies interested in aviation; and to employ and discharge, at his or her pleasure, engineers, architects, and other assistants as he or she may deem advisable and fix their compensation within the amounts appropriated for their compensation, subject, however, to the approval of the director of administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1353, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 110, § 2; P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

1-2-2

; P.L. 2000, ch. 371, § 2.

1-2-3.
Acquisition of land.

The department of transportation may, with the approval of the governor, and subject to the provisions of chapter 6 of title 37, acquire, by purchase or condemnation, any land or any estate or interest in land, including airspace within this state that it may deem necessary for a suitable airport or landing field, or to preserve, maintain, or restore an approach, but in no event shall the department obligate the state in excess of the sums appropriated for that purpose. No land or estate in this state owned and used by any railroad company shall be taken by condemnation under this chapter until after a hearing before the public utilities administrator of this state and until the consent of the public utilities administrator to the taking is given.

No airport, landing field, or any runway or approach zone shall be enlarged or extended in any city or town unless the assistant director for airports, or his or her successor or other person or officer exercising his or her functions, filed in the office of the city or town clerk of the city or town in which the expansion is proposed a plan drawn to scale showing the existing airport and runways, which must have been included in the federal aviation administration approved master plan documents; the planned extensions or lengthening of the existing runways; any and all public highways crossed by the extensions; and lots and parcels of land within a one-mile distance of the proposed extensions; together with a delineation of any approach zone required by the extension and an identification of every parcel of land that requires a taking in order to accomplish the extension together with a brief statement describing the work to be undertaken in extending the runway. The plan and statement shall be filed at least twelve (12) months before any physical construction work begins on any extension of runway or airport expansion.

The assistant director for airports shall also, at the time plans are filed with the clerk, file a notice in a newspaper having general circulation in the city and town setting forth that the plan has been filed in the office of the city or town clerk and giving notice to the residents of the city or town of the proposed runway extension or airport expansion.

The plan and statement shall be open to public inspection in the office of the city or town. A public hearing shall be held in the city or town at least six (6) months prior to any construction on the proposed runway or airport expansion by the assistant director at the time and place in the city or town set forth in the notice referred to in subsection (c).

The governor has the authority in any emergency declared by him or her to authorize the enlargement or extension of any runway notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1353, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 110, § 4; P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

1-2-3

; P.L. 1970, ch. 256, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 349, § 1, effective July 12, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 350, § 1, effective July 12, 2021.

1-2-3.1.
Airport, landing field, runway, and approach defined.

As used in this chapter:

“Airport” or “landing field” means any area of land designed and set aside for the approach, landing, and taking off of aircraft and utilized or to be utilized in the interest of the public for those purposes. An airport is publicly owned if the portion used for the landing and taking off of aircraft is owned, operated, controlled, leased to or leased by the United States, or any agency or department of the United States, this state or any other state or any municipality or other political subdivision of this state, or any other state, or any other governmental body, public agency, or other public corporation.

“Approach,” “approach zone,” “approaches” means any airport land, airspace, and surfaces as set forth by the Federal Aviation Administration and Code of Federal Regulations in Title 14 Code of Federal Regulations Part 77 — Safe, Efficient Use, and Preservation of the Navigable Airspace.

“Runway” means that portion of an airport or landing field designed or set aside for use by aircraft in landing, taking off, or taxiing or moving of aircraft on the ground. A runway shall be construed to include any projection or extension for use as an approach zone, and approaches as set forth in §

1-3-7

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

1-2-3.1

; P.L. 1970, ch. 256, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 349, § 1, effective July 12, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 350, § 1, effective July 12, 2021.

1-2-4.
Contracts for development and operation of airports.

The department of transportation is authorized to make contracts on behalf of the state in relation to the development, operation, and maintenance of a state airport or landing field and to grade the grounds and put them into suitable condition for use as a landing field and to provide any facilities and accommodations that it may deem necessary. All contracts are awarded as provided in §

42-11-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1353, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 110, § 6; P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

1-2-4

.

1-2-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1932, ch. 1889, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 110, § 12; P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 2; G.L. 1956 §

1-2-5

; P.L. 1983, ch. 32, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2000, ch. 371, § 5, effective July 19, 2000.

1-2-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1932, ch. 1889, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 110, § 3; P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

1-2-6

; P.L. 1983, ch. 32, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 16, effective July 6, 2001.

1-2-7.
Leases, concessions, and licenses.

The department of transportation may lease any portion of any airport or landing field owned or operated by the state or any of the buildings or structures erected on any airport or landing field and grant concessions upon portions of any airport or landing field owned or operated by the state for a period not exceeding five (5) years, with or without renewal options for a like period, in the manner prescribed by §

37-7-9

. Where a substantial building, renovation, improvement, or addition to an existing building is to be constructed for any airport or aeronautical service, activity, purpose, or function or any allied service, activity, purpose, or function, the department may lease in the manner provided in §

37-7-9

any portion of any airport or landing field owned or operated by the state for a period not exceeding thirty (30) years.

In all department leases, concessions, licenses, and in all landing fee schedules imposed by the department, provisions shall be included requiring a graduated scale of payments designed to encourage take-offs and landings between the hours of 6:30 a.m. and midnight (12:00 a.m.). Any landings occurring after midnight (12:00 a.m.) and before 6:30 a.m. because of conditions beyond the control of the airlines and/or aircraft operator are not subject to any additional landing fees.

The department shall include a provision in all leases, licenses, and concessions requiring aircraft landing at Rhode Island T.F. Green International Airport:

To be equipped with noise and emission abatement devices as required by federal law or regulation in effect on July 1, 1985; and

By January 1, 1989, to be equipped with noise and emission abatement devices as contained in federal aviation regulation, part 36, noise standards: aircraft type and airworthiness certification scheduled to take effect on January 1, 1989.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1353, § 5; P.L. 1932, ch. 1889, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 110, § 7; P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

1-2-7

; P.L. 1966, ch. 241, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 32, § 4; P.L. 1985, ch. 333, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 32, § 2, effective June 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 36, § 2, effective June 1, 2021.

1-2-7.1.
Relating to airport and landing fields.

The Rhode Island airport corporation has jurisdiction over the state airports and airport facilities, and the general assembly recognizes that the safe and efficient operation of the airports and airport facilities is of paramount importance to the citizens of the state of Rhode Island. The general assembly has found and hereby declares that it is in the public interest and essential to the welfare and well-being of the citizens of the state for the Rhode Island airport corporation to lease or grant concessions of real property not necessary from time to time for airport use to state or municipal governmental authorities to enable such governmental authorities to carry out their governmental functions and purposes.

The Rhode Island airport corporation, together with the Rhode Island department of transportation, is hereby authorized to lease to the town of Westerly that certain parcel of real property located at the Westerly Airport consisting of approximately one hundred and twenty-two thousand nine hundred and sixty-four (122,964) square feet situated easterly of Airport Road in the town of Westerly, county of Washington, state of Rhode Island, and described as follows: Beginning at a railroad spike set on a point of tangency a bearing of S 77 degrees 49 minutes 49 seconds E and a radial distance of two hundred ten and forty hundredths (210.40) feet from Station 44-25.15 as shown on Rhode Island State Highway Plat No. 1159 at the northwesterly corner of the herein-described parcel;

thence N 88 degrees 20 minutes 30 seconds E along a line forty (40) feet southerly and parallel with the northerly Westerly Airport property line of an access road leading to the Westerly Airport terminal a distance of six hundred ninety-four and seventeen hundredths (694.17) feet to an iron pin with cap set at a point of curvature;

thence proceeding easterly bearing southerly along a curve with a radius of fifteen and zero hundredths (15.00) feet with a central angle of 144 degrees 45 minutes 45 seconds, with a chord bearing of S 19 degrees 16 minutes 38 seconds E and a chord distance of twenty-eight and fifty-nine hundredths (28.59) feet, an arc length of thirty-seven and ninety hundredths (37.90) feet to an iron pin with cap set at a point of tangency;

thence S 53 degrees 06 minutes 15 seconds W along access road a distance of three hundred thirty-nine and seventy-one hundredths (339.71) feet to an iron pin with cap set at a point of curvature;

thence proceeding southwesterly bearing westerly along said access road along a curve with a radius of two hundred twenty and zero hundredths (220.00) feet, a central angle of 81 degrees 40 minutes 24 seconds, with a chord bearing of N 86 degrees 03 minutes 33 seconds W and a chord distance of two hundred eighty-seven and seventy-two hundredths (287.72) feet, an arc distance of three hundred thirteen and sixty hundredths (313.60) feet to an iron pin with cap set at a point of tangency;

thence N 45 degrees 13 minutes 21 seconds W along said access road a distance of two hundred twenty-two and seventy-four hundredths (222.74) feet to an iron pin with a cap set at a point of curvature;

thence proceeding northwesterly bearing northerly along a curve with a radius of twenty and zero hundredths (20.00) feet, a central angle of 133 degrees 33 minutes 51 seconds, a chord bearing of N 21 degrees 33 minutes 34 seconds E and a chord distance of thirty-six and seventy-six hundredths (36.76) feet, an arc distance of forty-six and sixty-two hundredths (46.62) feet to the point and place of beginning.

The herein described new Lot A contains one hundred twenty-two thousand nine hundred sixty-four (122,964) square feet of land or two and eight hundred twenty-three thousandths (2.823) acres be the same, more or less.

The herein-described new Lot A is shown on that plan entitled “Minor Subdivision, Proposed Westerly Police Station, out of AP 108, Lot 19, Westerly Airport, Westerly, Rhode Island, scale 1" =40", dated 5/21/05, prepared for the Rhode Island airport corporation by Bryant Associates, Inc., Engineers and Surveyors, Thomas D. Drury, Jr., PLS” together with all structures and improvements located and/or to be built thereon, for the purpose of constructing and maintaining a police station, for a period not in excess of ninety-nine (99) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 9, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 10, § 1.

1-2-8.
Sale of improvements — Proceeds of sales and leases.

As provided in §

37-7-5

, the department of transportation has the power, with the approval of the state properties committee, to sell any buildings or improvements located on any land and not required for the purpose of this chapter, and all proceeds arising from any sale and all income from any lease or concession shall be turned over to the general treasurer for the use of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1353, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 110, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 261; impl. am. P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

1-2-8

.

1-2-9.
Reconveyance or sale of surplus lands.

The director of transportation, when he or she deems any land or interests in land acquired or taken under the provisions of this chapter to be no longer required for the purposes of this chapter, may dispose of those lands or interests in lands in the manner prescribed by §

37-7-3

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 110, § 15; P.L. 1949, ch. 2385, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1953, ch. 3105, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

1-2-9

.

1-2-10.
Contracts and expenditures limited to appropriations.

The department of transportation shall not enter into any contract or agreement or take any action involving the expenditure of money until an appropriation has been made for that purpose and funds are available for expenditure by the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1353, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 110, § 9; P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

1-2-10

.

1-2-11.
Interest of airport corporation employees prohibited.

No employee of the airport corporation shall have any financial interest, directly or indirectly, in any of the land or any estate or interest in land acquired by the state pursuant to §

1-2-3

; in any contract or undertaking relating to the construction or equipment of a state airport; or in the laying out of its grounds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1353, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 110, § 11; P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

1-2-11

; P.L. 1998, ch. 441, § 3; P.L. 2000, ch. 371, § 2.

1-2-12.
Appropriations — Disbursements.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sums that it may deem necessary for the purposes of this chapter, and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer from time to time for the payment of those sums, or so much of those sums, as may be necessary, upon receipt by him or her of vouchers signed by the director of transportation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1932, ch. 1889, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 110, § 13; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

1-2-12

.

1-2-13.
Annual report to general assembly.

The department of transportation shall annually report to the general assembly the progress of the work entrusted to it, the contracts outstanding, the sums expended, and the obligations incurred by it to the date of the report.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1353, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 110, § 14; P.L. 1940, ch. 851, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

1-2-13

.

1-2-14.
Peters-Fournier Airport.

The north central airport in Rhode Island shall be officially named and known as “The Peters-Fournier Airport of Rhode Island”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3113, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

1-2-14

.

1-2-14.1.
Chester M. Spooner Memorial Building.

The administration building at the north central airport, shall be officially named the “Chester M. Spooner Memorial Building” and the wording of any plaque or sign shall be appropriately designed and displayed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 3, § 1.

1-2-14.2.
The Colonel Robert F. Wood Air Park.

The Newport Air Park and the Newport State Airport shall be officially named and known as “The Colonel Robert F. Wood Air Park.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 34, § 1.

1-2-15.
Leasing for purposes of national defense.

The airport corporation may lease to the United States government or agencies of the United States government, when the lease concerns matters of national defense or aviation safety or convenience, any portion of any airport or landing field or any of the buildings or structures on the airport or landing field for a period or periods not to exceed fifty (50) years; the lease to be executed by the director containing any reasonable conditions, rules, restrictions and regulations as the assistant director for airports deems suitable or necessary and be approved as to substance by the director of administration and as to form by the attorney general.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 131, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 371, § 2.

1-2-16.
Noise and emissions directives.

The director is directed to issue operating procedures and directives requiring that aircraft utilizing Rhode Island T.F. Green International Airport, to the greatest extent possible, commensurate with passenger safety and federal law and regulation, minimize the use of reverse engine thrust employed to slow an aircraft as it lands.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 333, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 371, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 32, § 2, effective June 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 36, § 2, effective June 1, 2021.

1-2-17.
Payment for compensation for municipal services to the city of Warwick.

The Rhode Island airport corporation, from a parking surcharge at the Rhode Island T.F. Green International Airport as defined by a 1988 agreement between the state acting by and through the director of transportation and the city of Warwick, shall pay to the city of Warwick out of the parking revenue received at Rhode Island T.F. Green International Airport as compensation for municipal services provided at Rhode Island T.F. Green International Airport a sum of not less than two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($275,000) for fiscal year 1994 payable quarterly; for each fiscal year after 1994, this sum may be reviewed or renegotiated, or both, by the mayor of the city of Warwick and the airport corporation, but in no event will the sum be less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in any fiscal year beginning after 1993 and before 2005, or less than seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) in any fiscal year beginning after 2004, provided any payments provided or any portion of these payments is not disapproved by the FAA. In the event that the FAA disapproves this payment from the airport corporation, the state shall pay to the city of Warwick the sums of money required to insure that the city of Warwick receives five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 468, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 273, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 34, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 40, § 3; P.L. 2021, ch. 32, § 2, effective June 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 36, § 2, effective June 1, 2021.

1-2-17.1.
Sales taxes and surcharges on customer facility charges.

Moneys due and payable as sales taxes and rental vehicle surcharges on customer facility charges shall be deposited in a restricted receipt account entitled “receipts of sales taxes and surcharges on customer facility charges”. The Rhode Island airport corporation shall provide to the department of administration information related to the amount of customer facility charges remitted on or before June 30 of each year.

The amounts on deposit in the account for receipts of sales taxes and surcharges on customer facility charges shall be transferred to the city of Warwick as general revenues.

“Customer facility charge” means the customer facility charge collected by rental companies, as defined in §

31-34.1-1

, pursuant to regulations promulgated by the Rhode Island airport corporation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 40, § 2.

1-2-17.2.
Municipal services at Rhode Island T.F. Green International Airport.

The municipal services to be provided to the Rhode Island T.F. Green International Airport as referenced in §

1-2-17

shall include, but not be limited to:

Providing primary response and command for all structure fire alarms on the airport corporation property outside the airfield, and E-911 reporting system calls for extrications, industrial accidents, motor vehicle accidents, confined-space incidents, hazardous-material incidents and spills outside the airfield, and secondary response to airfield incidents on Rhode Island airport corporation property;

Responding to and providing treatment and transportation for all emergency medical service calls on Rhode Island airport corporation property; and

Maintaining a mutual aid agreement to respond to any potential catastrophe or emergency resulting from airport operations.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the jurisdiction of the state police in connection with response to or command of any emergency incident on the airport corporation property.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 438, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 32, § 2, effective June 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 36, § 2, effective June 1, 2021.

1-2-18.
Parking fees in support of satellite airports.

Moneys due and payable to the state from any increase in parking fees at the Rhode Island T.F. Green International Airport, beyond those in effect May 1, 1991, shall be deposited in a restricted-receipt account entitled “parking fees in support of airports.”

The receipts annually transferred to the account in support of the operations of airports shall not exceed the amount approved by the general assembly. Revenues in excess of the amount approved by the general assembly for expenditures shall be recorded as general revenue of the state and transferred to the general fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 42, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 32, § 2, effective June 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 36, § 2, effective June 1, 2021.

1-2-19.
Right of inspection — Governmental agencies.

Any state agency, or agency of a municipality that abuts a state-owned airport or landing field, as defined in this chapter, is authorized to send staff members or investigators upon the premises of any airport or landing field as regulated by this title for the purpose of inspecting the premises for compliance with state or municipal laws.

The agency investigating shall comply with pertinent Federal Aviation Administration safety guidelines to ensure public safety during the course of the investigation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 390, § 1.

1-2-20.
Severability.

Should any of the provisions contained in this chapter be in violation of any federal rule and/or regulation resulting in a loss of federal funding of whatever nature or kind then the provision shall be declared null and void and all other provisions of this chapter shall remain in full force and effect.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 333, § 2.

1-2-21.
Payment for compensation for municipal services to state airports.

The Rhode Island airport corporation shall, subject to the approval of the Federal Aviation Administration, reimburse any municipality for the cost of municipal services provided by the municipality at any airport constructed or operated by the state upon receipt of appropriate documentation from the municipality in accordance with the requirements of the Federal Aviation Administration’s Policy and Procedures Concerning the Use of Airport Revenue, Section V (Permitted Uses of Airport Revenue). D. Standard of Documentation for the Reimbursement to Government Entities of Costs of Services and Contributions Provided to Airports 64 Fed. Reg. 7996.7719 (1999).

This section shall not apply to the city of Warwick or Rhode Island T.F. Green International Airport.

The municipal services to be provided to the airports as referenced in subsection (a) shall include, but not be limited to:

Providing primary response and command for all structure fire alarms on the airport corporation property outside the airfield and E-911 reporting system calls for extrications, industrial accidents, motor vehicle accidents, confined-spaced incidents, hazardous-material incidents and spills outside the airfield, and secondary response to airfield incidents on Rhode Island airport corporation property;

Responding to and providing treatment and transportation for all emergency medical service calls on Rhode Island airport corporation property; and

Maintaining a mutual aid agreement to respond to any potential catastrophe or emergency resulting from airport operations.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the jurisdiction of the state police in connection with response to, or command of, any emergency incident on the airport corporation property.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 198, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 32, § 2, effective June 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 36, § 2, effective June 1, 2021.

1-2-22.
Rhode Island T.F. Green International Airport.

The state airport located in the city of Warwick known as Theodore Francis Green state airport or T.F. Green state airport, shall hereafter be officially named and known as “Rhode Island T.F. Green International Airport.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 32, § 1, effective June 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 36, § 1, effective June 1, 2021.